Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $5,504,403 for  developing and implementing programs created
under chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 3427).
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Revenue, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $2,789,361,  for the Corporate Division, for the implementation
of the corporate activity tax established under chapter 122, Oregon Laws  2019 (Enrolled
House Bill 3427).
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Revenue, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,165,000 for the core  systems replacement program and the
implementation of the corporate activity tax  established under chapter 122, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 3427).
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$472,740,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the  maximum limit for
payments of grant-in-aid, program costs  and purchased services by the Department of Edu-
cation from  the Student Investment Account established by section 8, chapter 122, Oregon
Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 3427).
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payments
of grant-in-aid, program costs and purchased services by the Department of  Education from
the Early Learning Account established by section 51,  chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019 (En-
rolled House Bill 3427), for the following purposes:
(1) Early Intervention Services
and Early Childhood Special
Education programs as
defined in ORS 343.035 .............. $ 37,500,000
(2) Relief Nurseries ........................ $ 2,800,000
(3) Early Childhood Equity Fund.... $ 10,000,000
(4) Oregon Prekindergarten
Enrolled House Bill 5047 (HB 5047-A) Page 1
program .................................... $ 44,399,232
(5) Early Head Start program ........ $ 22,343,688
(6) Preschool Promise program ...... $ 30,795,390
(7) Capacity development and
other learning programs ........... $ 8,753,040
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses by the Department of Education  from the Early Learning Account established
by section 51, chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House  Bill 3427), for the following
programs:
(1) Professional development for
early learning professionals ...... $ 12,500,000
(2) Operations................................. $ 2,033,387
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payments
of grant-in-aid, program costs and purchased services by the Department of  Education from
the Statewide Education Initiatives Account established by section 24,  chapter 122, Oregon
Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 3427), for the following purposes:
(1) High School Graduation and
College and Career
Readiness Fund......................... $133,200,000
(2) Nutritional assistance
programs................................... $ 41,607,714
(3) Reengagement program ............ $ 4,000,000
(4) Statewide equity initiatives....... $ 8,000,000
(5) School safety initiatives ............ $ 1,725,119
(6) Summer early learning grants .. $ 3,000,000
(7) Grants to education service
districts for technical
assistance.................................. $ 24,000,000
(8) Early warning system grants ... $ 2,750,000
(9) Student success grants ............. $ 12,000,000
SECTION 8.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses  by the Department of Education from the Statewide Education Initiatives Ac-
count established by section 24, chapter 122, Oregon Laws  2019 (Enrolled House Bill 3427), for
the following purposes:
(1) Professional development and
training for educators ............... $ 15,000,000
(2) Operations................................. $ 19,839,266
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5515), as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys, or other  revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or
received by the Department of  Justice, for the General Counsel Division, is increased by
$464,086 for the purposes of  implementing the provisions of chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019
(Enrolled House Bill 3427).
SECTION 10. Sections 4 to 8 of this 2019 Act become  operative on the date that chapter
122, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 3427), becomes law.
SECTION 11. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled House Bill 5047 (HB 5047-A) Page 2
Passed by House May 13, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 23, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5047 (HB 5047-A) Page 3